Maryland, session 2025, SB0439.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
12–104.1.
(a) (1) In this section, “high impact economic development activity” means an
initiative, transaction, or other undertaking by the University System of Maryland or one
of its constituent institutions to create or facilitate:
[(1)] (I) 20 or more new jobs in the State of Maryland;
[(2)] (II) The award or completion of at least $1,000,000 in externally
funded research or other projects;
[(3)] (III) The establishment or relocation of one or more new companies to
be registered or incorporated in the State and doing business in the State;
[(4)] (IV) The production of at least $1,000,000 of annual gross revenue;
[(5)] (V) The licensing and potential commercialization of a promising
new technology or other product; or
[(6)] (VI) An academic program to meet workforce demand in a
documented labor shortage field.
(2) “HIGH IMPACT DEVELOPMENT ACTIVITY” DOES NOT INCLUDE
COST SAVINGS RELATED TO THE REDUCTION IN THE NUMBER OF UNIVERSITY
EMPLOYEES.
(b) To promote the economic interests of the State as mandated in §§ 10–205(c)
and 15–107 of this article, the University System of Maryland shall utilize its powers as a
public corporation established in § 12–104 of this subtitle to undertake high impact
economic development activities that support:
(1) Job creation and workforce development;
(2) Technology transfer, commercialization, and entrepreneurship; and
(3) Increased sponsored research funding and other revenues.
(c) In order for an activity to qualify as a high impact economic development
activity:

SENATE BILL 439 3
(1) The president of a constituent institution, or the president’s designee,
shall forward a request to the Chancellor for certification that the activity meets the criteria
defined in subsection (a) of this section; and
(2) The Chancellor, or the Chancellor’s designee, shall notify the Board of
Regents and the Board of Public Works of any certified activity for review.
(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for any high impact
economic development activity within the scope of § 5–310 or § 10–305 of the State Finance
and Procurement Article, the Board of Regents shall be fully responsible for administering
the review and comment process prescribed in those sections.
(2) In administering the review and comment process prescribed in §§
5–310 and 10–305 of the State Finance and Procurement Article, the Board of Regents shall
include in that process the appropriate legislative committees and units of State
government, which may include:
(i) Committees of the General Assembly;
(ii) The Board of Public Works;
(iii) The Maryland Historic Trust;
(iv) The Department of Planning;
(v) The Department of the Environment; and
(vi) The Department of Natural Resources.
(3) The Board of Regents shall adopt policies and procedures to ensure that
the notice and opportunity for review are conducted in a manner that provides a reasonable
period to complete while not impairing the institution’s capacity for the expeditious and
successful pursuit of a high impact economic development activity.
(e) (1) On or before October 1 of each year, the Board of Regents shall report
to the Board of Public Works and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, the Senate Finance Committee, the House Economic Matters Committee, the
Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, and the House Appropriations Committee on the
high impact economic development activities undertaken under this section during the
preceding fiscal year.
(2) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:

SENATE BILL 439
(I) THE AMOUNT OF STATE OR UNIVERSITY FUNDS USED ON
EACH HIGH IMPACT ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ACTIVITY DURING THE PRECEDING
YEAR;
(II) THE NET BENEFIT OF EACH HIGH IMPACT ECONOMIC
DEVELOPMENT ACTIVITY; AND
(III) WHETHER THE BOARD OF REGENTS BELIEVES THAT EACH
HIGH IMPACT ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ACTIVITY IS IN THE BEST INTEREST OF THE
STATE.
12–113.
(a) Consistent with § 15–107 of this article and any other applicable law, the
Board of Regents may establish, invest in, finance, and operate businesses or business
entities when the Board finds that doing so would further one or more goals of the
University and is related to the mission of the University.
(c) (1) Subject to the requirements of this section, an institution may
establish, invest in, finance, or operate a corporation, foundation, consortium, or other
entity that is intended to support a high impact economic development activity, as defined
in § 12–104.1 of this subtitle.
[(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of §§ 5–501 through 5–504 of the
General Provisions Article and subject to § 5–525 of the General Provisions Article, an
official or employee of a public institution of higher education may be a director, official, or
employee of an entity intended to support a high impact economic development activity, if
the individual’s participation advances the interests of the institution.
(3) Division II of the State Finance and Procurement Article does not apply
to transactions between an entity established, financed, or operated under this subsection
and the institution or consortium of institutions that established, financed, or operated the
entity.]
[(4)] (2) (i) The Board of Regents shall adopt policies and procedures
governing the establishment of high impact economic development entities to ensure that
the institution’s participation in the entity furthers the interests of the institution, the
University System of Maryland, and the State.
(ii) The policies and procedures under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph shall include requirements for:
1. Recognition of the entity by the Board of Regents;
2. An annual audit of the entity by an independent certified
public accountant; and

SENATE BILL 439 5
3. THE LEGISLATIVE AUDITOR TO AUDIT ALL
EXPENDITURES AND ACCOUNTS OF THE ENTITY DURING AN AUDIT CONDUCTED
UNDER § 12–105 OF THIS SUBTITLE AND IN ACCORDANCE WITH §§ 2–1220 THROUGH
2–1227 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE; AND
4. Adequate safeguards with regard to conflicts of interest,
proper contracting practices, and other fundamental ethical and business practice
standards.
14–104.1.
(a) (1) In this section, “high impact economic development activity” means an
initiative, transaction, or other undertaking by Morgan State University to create or
facilitate:
[(1)] (I) 20 or more new jobs in the State;
[(2)] (II) The award or completion of at least $1,000,000 in externally
funded research or other projects;
[(3)] (III) The establishment or relocation of one or more new companies to
be registered or incorporated in the State and doing business in the State;
[(4)] (IV) The production of at least $1,000,000 of annual gross revenue;
[(5)] (V) The licensing and potential commercialization of a promising
new technology or other product; or
[(6)] (VI) An academic program to meet workforce demand in a
documented labor shortage field.
(2) “HIGH IMPACT ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ACTIVITY” DOES NOT
INCLUDE COST SAVINGS RELATED TO THE REDUCTION IN THE NUMBER OF
UNIVERSITY EMPLOYEES.
(b) To promote the economic interests of the State as mandated in §§ 10–205(c)
and 15–107 of this article, the Morgan State University shall utilize its powers as a public
corporation established in § 14–104 of this subtitle to undertake high impact economic
development activities that support:
(1) Job creation and workforce development;
(2) Technology transfer, commercialization, and entrepreneurship; and
(3) Increased sponsored research funding and other revenues.

SENATE BILL 439
(c) In order for an activity to qualify as a high impact economic development
activity:
(1) The President or the President’s designee shall certify that the activity
meets the criteria defined in subsection (a) of this section; and
(2) The President or the President’s designee shall notify the Board of
Regents and the Board of Public Works of any certified activity for review.
(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for any high impact
economic activity within the scope of § 5–310 or § 10–305 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article, the Board of Regents shall be fully responsible for administering the
review and comment process prescribed in those sections.
(2) In administering the review and comment process prescribed in §§
5–310 and 10–305 of the State Finance and Procurement Article, the Board of Regents shall
include in the process the appropriate legislative committees and units of State
government, which may include:
(i) Committees of the General Assembly;
(ii) The Board of Public Works;
(iii) The Maryland Historical Trust;
(iv) The Department of Planning;
(v) The Department of the Environment; and
(vi) The Department of Natural Resources.
(3) The Board of Regents shall adopt policies and procedures to ensure that
the notice and opportunity for review are conducted in a manner that provides a reasonable
period to complete while not impairing the institution’s capacity for the expeditious and
successful pursuit of a high impact economic development activity.
(e) (1) On or before October 1 of each year, the Board of Regents shall report
to the Board of Public Works and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, the Senate Finance Committee, the House Economic Matters Committee, the
Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, and the House Appropriations Committee on the
high impact economic development activities undertaken under this section during the
preceding fiscal year.
(2) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:

SENATE BILL 439 7
(I) THE AMOUNT OF STATE OR UNIVERSITY FUNDS USED ON
EACH HIGH IMPACT ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ACTIVITY DURING THE PRECEDING
YEAR;
(II) THE NET BENEFIT OF EACH HIGH IMPACT ECONOMIC
DEVELOPMENT ACTIVITY; AND
(III) WHETHER THE BOARD OF REGENTS BELIEVES THAT EACH
HIGH IMPACT ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ACTIVITY IS IN THE BEST INTEREST OF THE
STATE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.